Florida, session 2026, HB4055.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of the
Beverage Law as defined in s. 561.01(6), Florida Statutes, the
holder of any alcoholic beverage vendor license that permits
sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises,
and for which the designated premises of such license are
located on any property within the Lake Wales Arts, Culture and
Entertainment District of the City of Lake Wales, shall be
authorized to allow patrons to remove any alcoholic beverage in
an open container from the licensed vendor premises for purposes
of consumption away from the licensed vendor premises within the
district. Such licensed alcoholic beverage vendors located
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4055 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4055 2026 Legislature
within the district shall be authorized to allow patrons to
remove alcoholic beverages from the licensed vendor premises
regardless of the class, type, or series of license held and
without the need for additional licensure or approval by the
Division of Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco.
Section 2. The holder of any alcoholic beverage vendor
license located within the Lake Wales Arts, Culture and
Entertainment District shall comply with all other local
ordinances, state alcoholic beverage laws, and rules of the
division not inconsistent herewith.
Section 3. For the purposes of this act, the Lake Wales
Arts, Culture and Entertainment District means the area of land
situated in Section 2, Township 30 South, Range 27 East, City of
Lake Wales, Polk County, more particularly described as follows:

BEGIN at the southeast corner of Lot 1, Block 1 of
Heckscher Second Subdivision, according to the plat
thereof as recorded in Plat Book 6, Page 45, public
records of Polk County, Florida; thence Westerly along
the south line of Lots 1 through 20, Block 1 of said
Heckscher Second subdivision to the east right-of-way
line of Wetmore Street S; thence Northerly along said
east right-of-way line to the south right-of-way line
of Sessoms Avenue W; thence Easterly along said south
right-of-way line to the west right-of-way line of 1st
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4055 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4055 2026 Legislature
Street N; thence Southerly along said west right-of-
way line of 1st Street N to the intersection of said
west right-of-way line with the westerly projection of
the south right-of-way line of Crystal Ave. E; thence
Easterly along said westerly projection and south
right-of-way line of Crystal Ave. E to the northeast
corner of Lot A of Johnson Re-Subdivision of Lots 1
and 2, Block 24, of Original Town of Lake Wales,
according to the plat thereof as recorded in Plat Book
24, Page 34, public records of Polk County, Florida;
thence Northeasterly to the southwest corner of Block
21 of Map of Lake Wales, according to the plat thereof
as recorded in Plat Book 1C, Page 88A, public records
of Polk County, Florida; thence Northwesterly along
the west line of said Block 21 to the northwest corner
thereof; thence Easterly along the north line of said
Block 21 to the northeast corner thereof; thence
Southerly and Southwesterly along the east line of
said Block 21 to the southeast corner thereof; thence
Southerly to the northeast corner of Block T of
aforesaid Map of Lake Wales, according to the plat
thereof as recorded in Plat Book 1C, Page 88A; thence
Southerly, Southeasterly and Southerly along the east
line of said Block T to the southeast corner thereof;
thence Westerly along the south line of said Block T
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4055 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4055 2026 Legislature
to the southwest corner thereof; thence continue
Westerly to the southeast corner of Lot 20, Block 25
of aforesaid Map of Lake Wales, according to the plat
thereof as recorded in Plat Book 1C, Page 88A, said
southeast corner of Lot 20 being on the west right-of-
way line of the Atlantic Coast Line Railroad Corridor
as portrayed on said Map of Lake Wales; thence
Southeasterly along the platted west right-of-way line
of the Atlantic Coast Line Railroad Corridor according
to the plat thereof as recorded in Plat Book 1C, Page
88A to the southeast corner of Lot 1, Block 37 of
aforesaid Map of Lake Wales, according to the plat
thereof as recorded in Plat Book 1C, Page 88A; thence
Westerly along the south line of Lots 1 through 6,
Block 37 to the southwest corner of said Lot 6, Block
37; thence Westerly to the southeast corner of Lot 1,
Block 38 of aforesaid Map of Lake Wales, according to
the plat thereof as recorded in Plat Book 1C, Page
88A; thence Westerly along the south line of Lots 1
through 10, Block 38 to the southwest corner of said
Lot 10, Block 38; thence Northwesterly to the
aforesaid southeast corner of Lot 1, Block 1 of
Heckscher Second Subdivision, as recorded in Plat Book
6, Page 45 and the POINT OF BEGINNING.
100
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4055 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4055 2026 Legislature
101 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4055 -01-er